Massachusetts, session 194th, H5639.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of 
Nantucket acting by and through its conservation commission, may convey a certain parcel of 
land situated at 35 Grove lane, shown as Lot 5, on a plan of land entitled “Plan of Land in 
Nantucket, Massachusetts as prepared for Abbott E. Jr. and Frances J. Johnson” recorded with 
the Nantucket county registry of deeds in Plan File 8-A, owned by the town of Nantucket for 
purposes of preservation of habitat for wildlife, pursuant to a deed recorded with the Nantucket 
county registry of deeds in book 164, page 228, to the town of Nantucket acting by and through 
its select board for purposes of conveyance. 
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of 
Nantucket may transfer, sell, convey or otherwise dispose of all or a portion of a certain parcel of 
land situated in the town of Nantucket to the Nantucket Islands Land Bank for the purposes 

of 2 12 pursuant to its enabling legislation for open space, conservation and passive recreation purposes, 
and described as 35 Grove lane, shown on tax assessor’s map 71 as parcel 342. 
Any such disposition pursuant to this section shall be on such terms and conditions as the 
select board deems appropriate, which may include the reservation of restrictions and easements, 
all as shown on a map filed with the office of the town clerk. 
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.